District of Columbia statutes.
47-318.04

Mayoral budget submissions required; accounting of expenditures — Deadline for gap-closing submission.

The Mayor shall submit to the Council, no later than October 8, 1993, all explicit actions necessary to close the FY 1994 budget gap previously identified by the Mayor, as well as the dollar value of each action.

History

Nov. 25, 1993, D.C. Law 10-64, § 6, 40 DCR 7347
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-318.4.